Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-128.02
Replica, defined.

Replica means the designation of a vehicle which resembles a specific manufacturer's make and model that is at least thirty years old and which has been assembled as a kit vehicle.

Laws 2018, LB909, § 17.